Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-127
Statutes, rules, and regulations; availability; duty of department.

The department shall have available for each profession and business regulated under the Uniform Credentialing Act the applicable statutes, rules, and regulations relative to the credentials for the appropriate profession or business.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 69, p. 472;

C.S.1929, § 71-903;

R.S.1943, § 71-170;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 75;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 67;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 51;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 402;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 57;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-170;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 27.